Hawaii statutes.
[§329D-10] Types of manufactured marijuana
products. (a) The types of medical marijuana products that may be
manufactured and distributed pursuant to this chapter shall be limited to:

(1) Capsules;

(2) Lozenges;

(3) Pills;

(4) Oils and oil extracts;

(5) Tinctures;

(6) Ointments and skin lotions; and

(7) Other products as specified by the department.

(b) As used in this section, "lozenge" means
a small tablet manufactured in a manner to allow for the dissolving of its
medicinal or therapeutic component slowly in the mouth. [L 2015, c 241, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next